Utah statutes.
26-18-105.   Drug prior approval program.

(1)  A drug prior approval program approved or implemented by the board shall meet the following conditions:

(a)  except as provided in Subsection (2), a drug may not be placed on prior approval for other than medical reasons;

(b)  the board shall hold a public hearing at least 30 days prior to placing a drug on prior approval;

(c)  notwithstanding the provisions of Section 52-4-202, the board shall provide not less than 14 days' notice to the public before holding a public hearing under Subsection (1)(b);

(d)  the board shall consider written and oral comments submitted by interested parties prior to or during the hearing held in accordance with Subsection (1)(b);

(e)  the board shall provide evidence that placing a drug class on prior approval:

(i)  will not impede quality of recipient care; and

(ii)  that the drug class is subject to clinical abuse or misuse;

(f)  the board shall reconsider its decision to place a drug on prior approval:

(i)  no later than nine months after any drug class is placed on prior approval; and

(ii)  at a public hearing with notice as provided in Subsection (1)(b);

(g)  the program shall provide an approval or denial of a request for prior approval:

(i)  by either:

(A)  fax;

(B)  telephone; or

(C)  electronic transmission;

(ii)  at least Monday through Friday, except for state holidays; and

(iii)  within 24 hours after receipt of the prior approval request;

(h)  the program shall provide for the dispensing of at least a 72-hour supply of the drug on the prior approval program:

(i)  in an emergency situation; or

(ii)  on weekends or state holidays;

(i)  the program may be applied to allow acceptable medical use of a drug on prior approval for appropriate off-label indications; and

(j)  before placing a drug class on the prior approval program, the board shall:

(i)  determine that the requirements of Subsections (1)(a) through (i) have been met; and

(ii)  by majority vote, place the drug class on prior approval.

(2)  The board may, only after complying with Subsections (1)(b) through (j), consider the cost:

(a)  of a drug when placing a drug on the prior approval program; and

(b)  associated with including, or excluding a drug from the prior approval process, including:

(i)  potential side effects associated with a drug; or

(ii)  potential hospitalizations or other complications that may occur as a result of a drug's inclusion on the prior approval process.



Amended by Chapter 205, 2010 General Session

